Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Terms of Employment Generally.
§ 22.1-296.3.
Certain private school employees subject to fingerprinting and criminal records checks.

As a condition of employment, the governing boards or administrators of private elementary or secondary schools that are accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19 shall require any applicant who accepts employment, whether full time or part time or permanent or temporary, to submit to fingerprinting and to provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the applicant’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding such applicant.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an applicant’s record or notification that no record exists, shall report to the governing board or administrator, or to a private organization coordinating such records on behalf of such governing board or administrator pursuant to a written agreement with the Department of State Police, that the applicant meets the criteria or does not meet the criteria for employment based on whether or not the applicant has ever been convicted of any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange shall not disclose information to such governing board, administrator, or private organization coordinating such records regarding charges or convictions of any crimes. If any applicant is denied employment because of information appearing on the criminal history record and the applicant disputes the information upon which the denial was based, the Central Criminal Records Exchange shall, upon request, furnish the applicant the procedures for obtaining a copy of the criminal history record from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The information provided to the governing board, administrator, or private organization coordinating such records shall not be disseminated except as provided in this section. A governing board or administrator employing or previously employing a temporary teacher or a private organization coordinating such records on behalf of such governing board or administrator pursuant to a written agreement with the Department of State Police may disseminate, at the written request of such temporary teacher, whether such teacher meets the criteria or does not meet the criteria for employment pursuant to subsection A to the governing board or administrator of another accredited private elementary or secondary school in which such teacher has accepted employment. Such governing board, administrator, or private organization transferring criminal records information pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability for any official act, decision, or omission done or made in the performance of such transfer, when such acts or omissions are taken in good faith and are not the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct.

Fees charged for the processing and administration of background checks pursuant to this section shall not exceed the actual cost to the state of such processing and administration.

The governing board or administrator of a private elementary or secondary school that is accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19 that operates a child day program or family day system regulated by the Department pursuant to Chapter 14.1 (§ 22.1-289.02 et seq.) shall accept evidence of a background check in accordance with § 22.1-289.035 for individuals who are required to undergo a background check in accordance with that section as a condition of employment in lieu of the background check required by subsection A.

The governing boards or administrators of private elementary and secondary schools that are accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19 shall adopt and implement policies prohibiting any individual who is a governing board member, administrator, employee, contractor, or agent of a private elementary or secondary school to assist a governing board member, administrator, employee, contractor, or agent of such private elementary or secondary school in obtaining a new job if such individual knows or has probable cause to believe that the individual seeking new employment engaged in sexual misconduct regarding a minor or student in violation of law.

For purposes of this section, “governing board” or “administrator” means the unit or board or person designated to supervise operations of a system of private schools or a private school accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19.

Nothing in this section or §

19.2-389

shall be construed to require any private or religious school that is not so accredited to comply with this section.

History.

1996, c. 944; 1998, c. 113; 2002, c. 528; 2005, c. 928; 2016, c. 454; 2017, c. 809; 2020, cc. 779, 860, 861; 2022, c. 355.

Cross references.

As to dissemination of criminal history record information, see §

19.2-389

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by ch. 528, in the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “any offense set forth in §

63.2-1719

or §

63.2-1726

” for “murder, abduction for immoral purposes as set out in §

18.2-48

, sexual assault as set out in Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, failing to secure medical attention for an injured child, pandering as set out in §

18.2-355

, crimes against nature involving children as set out in §

18.2-361

, taking indecent liberties with children as set out in §

18.2-370

or §

18.2-370.1

, neglect of children as set out in §

18.2-371.1

, or obscenity offenses as set out in §

18.2-374.1

or §

18.2-379

, possession or distribution of drugs as set out in Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, arson as set out in Article 1 (§

18.2-77

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 18.2.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 928, throughout the section, substituted “religious” for “parochial” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 454, in subsection A, substituted “that are accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19” for “which are accredited by a statewide accrediting organization recognized, prior to January 1, 1996, by the State Board of Education” and deleted “for the first time after July 1, 1998” preceding “whether full-time” in the first paragraph, and deleted “or

63.2-1726

, use of a firearm in the commission of a felony as set out in §

18.2-53.1

, or an equivalent offense in another state” from the end of the second paragraph; in subsection B, deleted “or religious” preceding “elementary or secondary” in the first paragraph, rewrote the second paragraph, which read “In addition to the fees assessed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the Department of State Police may assess a fee for responding to requests required by this section which shall not exceed $15 per request for a criminal records check”; added subsection C; inserted the subsection D designation and substituted “schools or a private school accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19” for “or religious schools or a private or religious school accredited by a statewide accrediting organization recognized, prior to January 1, 1996, by the State Board of Education.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 809, in subsection A, substituted “any barrier crime as defined in §

19.2-392.02

” for “the following crimes or their equivalent if from another jurisdiction: any offense set forth in §

63.2-1719

” in the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 779 inserted a new subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection C, substituted “child day program or family day system regulated by the Department pursuant to Chapter 14.1 (§ 22.1-289.02 et seq.)” for “child welfare agency regulated by the Department of Social Services pursuant to Chapter 17 (§

63.2-1700

et seq.) of Title 63.2” and “§ 22.1-289.035” for “§

63.2-1720.1

.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 355 in subsection A in the first paragraph, substituted “full time or part time or permanent or temporary” for “full-time or part-time, permanent, or temporary”; in subsection C, deleted “Effective July 1, 2017” at the beginning; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-296.4.
Child abuse and neglect data required.

Every school board and every governing board or administrator of a private school accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19 shall require, as a condition of employment, that any applicant who is offered or accepts employment requiring direct contact with students, whether full-time or part-time, permanent or temporary, provide written consent and the necessary personal information for the school board, governing board, or administrator to obtain a search of the registry of founded complaints of child abuse and neglect maintained by the Department of Social Services pursuant to §

63.2-1515

. The school board, governing board, or administrator shall ensure that all such searches are requested in conformance with the regulations of the Board of Social Services. In addition, where the applicant has resided in another state within the last five years, the school board, governing board, or administrator shall require as a condition of employment that such applicant provide written consent and the necessary personal information for the school board, governing board, or administrator to obtain information from each relevant state as to whether the applicant was the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse and neglect in such state. The school board, governing board or administrator shall take reasonable steps to determine whether the applicant was the subject of a founded complaint of child abuse and neglect in the relevant state. The Department of Social Services shall maintain a database of central child abuse and neglect registries in other states that provide access to out-of-state school boards, for use by local school boards, governing boards, and administrators. The applicant may be required to pay the cost of any search conducted pursuant to this subsection at the discretion of the school board, governing board, or administrator. From such funds as may be available for this purpose, however, the school board or the governing board or administrator may pay for the search.The Department of Social Services shall respond to such request by the school board, governing board, or administrator in cases where there is no match within the central registry regarding applicants for employment within 10 business days of receipt of such request. In cases where there is a match within the central registry regarding applicants for employment, the Department of Social Services shall respond to such request by the school board, governing board, or administrator within 30 business days of receipt of such request. The request and response may be sent electronically or by first-class mail or facsimile transmission.

If the response obtained pursuant to subsection A indicates that the applicant is the subject of a founded case of child abuse and neglect, such applicant shall be denied employment or the employment shall be rescinded.

If an applicant is denied employment because of information appearing on his record in the registry, the school board, governing board, or administrator shall provide a copy of the information obtained from the registry to the applicant. The information provided to the school board, governing board, or administrator by the Department of Social Services shall be confidential and shall not be disseminated by the school board, governing board, or administrator.

History.

1997, c. 103; 2000, cc. 95, 734; 2008, c. 555; 2009, c. 58; 2016, c. 454; 2020, c. 300.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 454, cl. 2 provides “That the provisions of this act amending § 22.1-296.4 shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 95 and 734 are identical, and added the second paragraph of subsection A.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 555, in subsection A, inserted the third through the sixth sentences and substituted “of any search conducted pursuant to this subsection” for “of the search” in the seventh sentence; added subsection B; and redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 58, effective February 25, 2009, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, deleted the former fifth sentence, which read: “Such reasonable steps shall include, but not be limited to, contacting any central child abuse and neglect registry maintained by the relevant state.” and in the next to last sentence, inserted “that provide access to out-of-state school boards.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 454, effective July 1, 2017, inserted “governing board, or administrator” following “school board” and similar variations throughout the section; in subsection A, deleted “On and after July 1, 1997,” from the beginning and inserted “and every governing board or administrator of a private school accredited pursuant to § 22.1-19” in the first paragraph, substituted “10” for “ten” and “30” for “thirty” in the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 300 substituted “The request and response may be sent electronically or” for “The response may be” in the last sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 22.1-297.
Assignment of teachers, principals and assistant principals by superintendent.

A division superintendent shall have authority to assign to their respective positions in the school wherein they have been placed by the school board all teachers, principals and assistant principals. If the school board adopts a resolution authorizing the division superintendent to reassign such teachers, principals and assistant principals, the division superintendent may reassign any such teacher, principal or assistant principal for that school year to any school within such division, provided no change or reassignment during a school year shall affect the salary of such teacher, principal or assistant principal for that school year.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-205; 1956, Ex. Sess., c. 61; 1968, c. 643; 1980, cc. 559, 575.

Editor’s note.

Pursuant to § 30-152, the Code Commission has given effect in this section as set out above to the amendment to former § 22-205, from which this section is derived, in Acts 1980, c. 575.

§ 22.1-298.
Repealed by Acts 2006, cc. 27 and 349, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to regulations governing teacher licensure, see § 22.1-298.1.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-298, relating to regulations governing licensure, was derived from Code 1950, § 22-204; 1954, c. 638; 1958, c. 300; 1979, c. 532; 1980, c. 559; 1991, c. 273; 1992, c. 132; 1993, c. 286; 1996, c. 197; 1998, cc. 621, 826, 852; 1999, cc. 429, 1030, 1035, 1037; 2000, cc. 102, 689, 1068; 2002, cc. 128, 493; 2004, c. 46; 2005, cc. 891, 903.